Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MOBILE CRISIS GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for mobile crisis grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 245.4661, subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (15), and 245.4889, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (4). new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PROTECTED TRANSPORT START-UP GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for start-up grants to providers of nonemergency medical transportation services and mobile crisis teams to provide protected transport, including purchasing or configuring vehicles to meet protected transport requirements. new text end